Utah statutes.
78B-3-402.   Legislative findings and declarations -- Purpose of act.
(1)  The Legislature finds and declares that the number of suits and claims
for damages and the amount of judgments and settlements arising from health
care has increased greatly in recent years.  Because of these increases the
insurance industry has substantially increased the cost of medical malpractice
insurance.  The effect of increased insurance premiums and increased claims is
increased health care cost, both through the health care providers passing the
cost of premiums to the patient and through the provider's practicing
defensive medicine because he views a patient as a potential adversary in a
lawsuit.  Further, certain health care providers are discouraged from
continuing to provide services because of the high cost and possible
unavailability of malpractice insurance.
(2)  In view of these recent trends and with the intention of alleviating the
adverse effects which these trends are producing in the public's health care
system, it is necessary to protect the public interest by enacting measures
designed to encourage private insurance companies to continue to provide
health-related malpractice insurance while at the same time establishing a
mechanism to ensure the availability of insurance in the event that it becomes
unavailable from private companies.
(3)  In enacting this act, it is the purpose of the Legislature to provide a
reasonable time in which actions may be commenced against health care
providers while limiting that time to a specific period for which professional
liability insurance premiums can be reasonably and accurately calculated; and
to provide other procedural changes to expedite early evaluation and
settlement of claims.
